Maryland, session 2025, HB0452.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
SUBTITLE 13. OUTDOOR LIGHTING GUIDANCE.
12–1301.
(A) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, THE MARYLAND GREEN BUILDING
COUNCIL SHALL UPDATE OR DEVELOP GUIDANCE FOR THE PURCHASE OF OUTDOOR
LIGHTING FIXTURES IN CONSIDERATION OF RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING LIGHT
– 1 –

Ch. 389 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
POLLUTION AND COLOR TEMPERATURE PUBLISHED BY THE AMERICAN MEDICAL
ASSOCIATION.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION IS NOT SUBJECT TO ANY
GUIDELINES UPDATED OR DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
14–412.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Lamp” means the component of a luminaire that produces the light.
(3) “Lumen” means a unit of measurement of luminous flux.
(4) “Luminaire” means the complete lighting unit, including the lamp or
other component that produces light and the assembly that holds the lamp, including an
assembly housing, a mounting bracket or pole socket, a lamp holder, a ballast, a reflector
or mirror, and a refractor or lens.
(5) “Restricted uplight luminaire” means a luminaire that:
(i) except for a 0.5% maximum incidental uplight from reflection off
mounting hardware, allows no direct light emission above a horizontal plane through the
luminaire’s lowest light–emitting part; and
(ii) emits no more than 10% of the total direct light emission at or
above a vertical angle of 80 degrees.
(6) “State building” means a building owned or leased by the State or a unit
of the State.
(b) This section does not apply to a luminaire:
(1) located on the grounds of a correctional facility;
(2) required by federal regulation;
(3) required for storm operation activities performed by the Department of
Transportation;
(4) required to illuminate the State flag or the flag of the United States;
(5) used for sign illumination; [or]
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 389
(6) in a lighting plan where less than 25% of the luminaires are to be
replaced; OR
(7) USED TO ILLUMINATE THE FIELD OF PLAY AT A SPORTS FACILITY.
(c) State funds may not be used to install or replace a permanent outdoor
luminaire for lighting on the grounds of any State building [or], facility, PARK, OR TRAIL
unless:
(1) the luminaire is designed to maximize energy conservation and to
minimize light pollution, glare, and light trespass;
(2) EXCEPT FOR A LUMINAIRE INSTALLED OR REPLACED BY THE
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION, THE LUMINAIRE HAS A CORRELATED LIGHT
TEMPERATURE THAT IS LESS THAN OR EQUAL TO 3,000 KELVINS;
(3) the illumination produced by the luminaire is the minimum
illumination necessary for the intended purpose of the lighting; and
[(3)] (4) for a luminaire with an output of more than 1,800 lumens, the
luminaire is a restricted uplight luminaire.
(d) (1) The Board of Public Works or the Board’s designee may waive the
[requirement] REQUIREMENTS of subsection [(c)(3)] (C)(2) OR (4) of this section if, after
a request for a waiver has been made, the Board of Public Works or the Board’s designee
determines that the waiver is necessary for the lighting application.
(2) The Board of Public Works shall establish the requirements for a waiver
request under paragraph (1) of this subsection, including:
(i) a description of the lighting plan;
(ii) a description of the efforts made to comply with the requirements
of this section; and
(iii) the reason a waiver is necessary.
(3) In reviewing a waiver request, the Board of Public Works or the Board’s
designee shall consider design safety, costs, and any other factors the Board or the Board’s
designee determines are appropriate.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before September 30,
2026, the Department of Transportation shall conduct a review of highway lighting
practices and, where applicable, consider alterations to current State practices that are
inconsistent with the guidelines established in the most recent edition of the Federal
Highway Administration’s Lighting Handbook.
– 3 –

Ch. 389 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied to or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to the purchase of any outdoor lighting fixtures for a project for which the design
phase has been completed before the effective date of any guidance published in accordance
with § 12–1301 of the Public Safety Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 3. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 4 –